Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE F. COMMERCE AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT

For expiration of this chapter, see Section 490F.008.

CHAPTER 490F. TEXAS 2036 COMMISSION

Sec. 490F.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "commission" means the Texas 2036 Commission.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 490F.002. CREATION OF COMMISSION; COMPOSITION. (a) The Texas 2036 Commission is created.

(b) The commission is composed of the following members:

(1) the presiding officer of the legislative standing committee in each house of the legislature with primary jurisdiction over higher education;

(2) the commissioner of higher education;

(3) the chair of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board;

(4) the chair of the Texas Workforce Commission;

(5) the chair of a governing board of an institution of higher education appointed by the governor;

(6) a trustee of a public junior college district appointed by the governor;

(7) two persons appointed by the lieutenant governor, one of whom must possess experience in the field of education; and

(8) two persons appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one of whom must possess experience in the field of education.

(c) Appointed members of the commission serve for two years and may be reappointed.

(d) Appointments to the commission shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

(e) A vacancy in an appointed office of the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 490F.003. OFFICERS. The members serving under Section 490F.002(b)(1) shall serve as presiding officers of the commission and are entitled to vote on all matters before the commission.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 490F.004. COMPENSATION. A member of the commission serves without compensation but is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing functions as a member of the commission, subject to any applicable limitation on reimbursement provided by the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 490F.005. MEETINGS. The commission shall meet at the call of the presiding officers and as provided by commission rule.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 490F.006. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMISSION. (a) The commission may adopt rules as necessary for its procedures.

(b) The commission, with an emphasis on the changing demographics of this state, shall:

(1) assess and identify future higher education and workforce needs in the state and the state's ability to meet those needs; and

(2) develop recommendations for meeting those needs by the state's bicentennial in 2036, including recommendations for achieving the following goals by that date:

(A) attaining a state workforce in which at least 60 percent of its workers hold a postsecondary credential, certificate, or degree of value in the workplace;

(B) increasing by at least three the number of institutions of higher education designated as research institutions under the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board's accountability system;

(C) ensuring the alignment of workforce development with higher education in this state;

(D) increasing the college-attending population in this state to a level that is comparable to the best performing states on that measure;

(E) improving the affordability of higher education in this state while maintaining excellence; and

(F) ensuring the global competitiveness of the state workforce.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 490F.007. REPORTS. Not later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the commission shall report to the legislature its assessment of the state's ability to meet the future higher education and workforce needs of this state and its recommendations for meeting those needs, including by achieving the goals prescribed by Section 490F.006(b)(2).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 490F.008. EXPIRATION. This chapter expires and the commission is abolished January 1, 2037.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 978 (H.B. 2036), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.